Washington statutes.
RCW 35.85.070

Assessments—Bonds.

Any assessments so levied shall be collected, and bonds may be issued for the payment of the whole or any part of the cost of such improvement, in the manner now or hereafter provided for the collection of assessments and the issuance of bonds for other local improvements.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.85.070. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 168 s 3; RRS s 9005-3.]